Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4108
Legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby finds that health care services should be provided at the most favorable prices and that competition for health services should be promoted while ensuring the quality of health services provided to the patient.

Laws 1984, LB 902, § 8.